dictsource/bn_rules
  
.group ফ
        ফ        fV    // or [p#] ?
        _া) ফ (L11া_             f        // generated
        _া) ফ (L11া              f        // generated
        _L12া) ফ (L11া_          f        // generated
        _L12া) ফ (L11া           f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (L11ু_           f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (L11ু            f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (L11ু_        f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (L11ু         f        // generated
        L10) ফ (L11ু_            f        // generated
        L10) ফ (L11ু             f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (ডL12L10         f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (ডL12L10      f        // generated
        L10) ফ (ডL12L10          f        // generated
        _আ) ফ (L11L10L11         f        // generated
        _L12আ) ফ (L11L10L11      f        // generated
        আ) ফ (L11L10L11          f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (গL12_           f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (গL12            f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (গL12_        f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (গL12         f        // generated
        L10) ফ (গL12_            f        // generated
        L10) ফ (গL12             f        // generated
        _া) ফ (L11L12র           f        // generated
        _L12া) ফ (L11L12র        f        // generated
        া) ফ (L11L12র            f        // generated
        _ি) ফ (L11া_             f        // generated
        _ি) ফ (L11া              f        // generated
        _L12ি) ফ (L11া_          f        // generated
        _L12ি) ফ (L11া           f        // generated
        ি) ফ (L11া_              f        // generated
        ি) ফ (L11া               f        // generated
        _) ফ (তা_                fV       // generated
        _L12) ফ (তা_             fV       // generated
        _L12L12) ফ (তা_          fV       // generated
        ফ (তা_                   fV       // generated
        _L11) ফ (L11ন_           f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (L11ন            f        // generated
        _L12L11) ফ (L11ন_        f        // generated
        _L12L11) ফ (L11ন         f        // generated
        _পL12) ফ (L11L10_        fV       // generated
        _পL12) ফ (L11L10         fV       // generated
        পL12) ফ (L11L10_         fV       // generated
        পL12) ফ (L11L10          fV       // generated
        _লL10) ফ (L11L12L11      f        // generated
        লL10) ফ (L11L12L11       f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (L11L10_         f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (L11L10          f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (L11L10_      f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (L11L10       f        // generated
        L10) ফ (L11L10_          f        // generated
        L10) ফ (L11L10           f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (পL11_           f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (পL11            f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (পL11_        f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (পL11         f        // generated
        L10) ফ (পL11_            f        // generated
        L10) ফ (পL11             f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (বL12্           f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (বL12্        f        // generated
        L10) ফ (বL12্            f        // generated
        _খL10) ফ (_L12           f        // generated
        _খL10) ফ (L11L12_        f        // generated
        _খL10) ফ (L11L12         f        // generated
        খL10) ফ (_L12            f        // generated
        খL10) ফ (L11L12_         f        // generated
        খL10) ফ (L11L12          f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (L11ী_           fV       // generated
        _L11) ফ (L11ী            fV       // generated
        _ন) ফ (L11L10_           f        // generated
        _ন) ফ (L11L10            f        // generated
        _L12ন) ফ (L11L10_        f        // generated
        _L12ন) ফ (L11L10         f        // generated
        ন) ফ (L11L10_            f        // generated
        ন) ফ (L11L10             f        // generated
        _জ) ফ (L11L10_           f        // generated
        _জ) ফ (L11L10            f        // generated
        _L12জ) ফ (L11L10_        f        // generated
        _L12জ) ফ (L11L10         f        // generated
        জ) ফ (L11L10_            f        // generated
        জ) ফ (L11L10             f        // generated
        _া) ফ (L11ে_             f        // generated
        _া) ফ (L11ে              f        // generated
        _L12া) ফ (L11ে_          f        // generated
        _L12া) ফ (L11ে           f        // generated
        ্L12া) ফ (_L12           f        // generated
        _L11L10) ফ (হL12_        f        // generated
        _L11L10) ফ (হL12         f        // generated
        L11L10) ফ (হL12_         f        // generated
        L11L10) ফ (হL12          f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (লL12য           f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (লL12য        f        // generated
        L10) ফ (লL12য            f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (চL12_           f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (চL12            f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (চL12_        f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (চL12         f        // generated
        _এ) ফ (L11L10_           f        // generated
        _এ) ফ (L11L10            f        // generated
        _L12এ) ফ (L11L10_        f        // generated
        _L12এ) ফ (L11L10         f        // generated
        এ) ফ (L11L10_            f        // generated
        এ) ফ (L11L10             f        // generated
        L10L12L10) ফ (L11L12ন    fV       // generated
        _L10) ফ (তে_             f        // generated
        _L10) ফ (তে              f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (তে_          f        // generated
        _L12L10) ফ (তে           f        // generated
        L10) ফ (তে_              f        // generated
        L10) ফ (তে               f        // generated
        _র) ফ (L11াL11           f        // generated
        _L12র) ফ (L11াL11        f        // generated
        র) ফ (L11াL11            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (তে_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (লে_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (ছে_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (লাম_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (তাম_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (ছি_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (ছিল_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (লো_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (বে_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (বো_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (লেন_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (তেন_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (ছেন_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (বেন_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (তিস_            f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (লি_             f        // generated
        _L11) ফ (ছিস_            f        // generated
        ফ (B     f
  
